Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.180

Credit for voting.

Each registered voter casting a valid ballot will be credited with voting on his or her voter registration record.

[ 2011 c 10 s 56; 2003 c 111 s 1518. Prior: 2001 c 241 s 12; 1988 c 181 s 3; 1987 c 346 s 16; 1983 c 136 s 1; 1965 c 9 s 29.36.075; prior: 1961 c 78 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.36.330, 29.36.075.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.